Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Health Care


Sharing Ministries Tax Parity Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2358.8 of Title 68, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this act:





Req. No. 2580 Page 1


1. “Health care sharing ministry” (HCSM) means a not-for-profit


organization that is tax-exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and:


a. limits its members to those who share a common set of


ethical or religious beliefs,


b. acts as a facilitator among members who have financial


or medical needs to assist those with financial or


medical needs in accordance with criteria established


by the health care sharing ministry,


c. provides for the financial or medical needs of a


member through contributions from other members,


d. provides amounts that members may contribute with no


assumption of risk or promise to pay among the members


and no assumption of risk or promise to pay by the


health care sharing ministry to the members,


e. provides to the members a written statement at least


quarterly with the total dollar amount of qualified


medical needs actually shared in the previous


reporting period in accordance with criteria


established by the health care sharing ministry,


f. is annually audited by an independent certified public


accountant or firm of certified public accountants


which is made available to the public by providing a



Req. No. 2580 Page 2


copy upon request, or by posting on the website of the


organization, and


g. provides a written disclaimer on or accompanying all


applications and guideline materials distributed by or


on behalf of the organization that reads, in


substance: “Notice: The organization facilitating


the sharing of medical expenses is not an insurance


company, and neither its guidelines nor plan of


operation is an insurance policy. Whether anyone


chooses to assist you with your medical bills will be


totally voluntary because no other member will be


compelled by law to contribute toward your medical


bills. As such, participation in the organization or


a subscription to any of its documents should never be


considered to be insurance. Regardless of whether you


receive any payments for medical expenses or whether


this organization continues to operate, you are always


personally responsible for the payment of your own


medical bills.”;


2. “Qualified health care share received” means an amount an


individual taxpayer receives as a qualified individual and as a


result of membership in an HCSM to assist with a medical expense;


3. “Qualified health care sharing expenses” means amounts paid


by a qualified individual for membership in an HCSM for the

Req. No. 2580 Page 3


individual or the spouse or dependent of the individual, which shall


include:


a. the sharing of medical expenses with respect to the


HCSM, and


b. the payment of administrative fees of the HCSM; and


4. “Qualified individual” means any resident of this state who


has been an active member of an HCSM for at least one (1) month


during the tax year in which a deduction or exemption authorized


pursuant to this section is claimed.


B. For tax year 2027 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed a deduction from Oklahoma adjusted gross income in the


amount of qualified health care sharing expenses by a qualified


individual.


C. For tax year 2027 and subsequent tax years, any qualified


health care share received by an individual taxpayer shall be exempt


from taxable income.


D. The exemption and deduction provided by this section shall


be claimed on a form prescribed by the Oklahoma Tax Commission. The


Commission shall promulgate rules to implement the provisions of


this section including requirements for verifying claims.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2580 QD 12/18/2025 7:07:00 PM



Req. No. 2580 Page 4